Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1703] Medical education council.
(a) There is established within the University of Hawaii, the medical
education council consisting of the following thirteen members:

(1) The dean of the school of medicine at the
University of Hawaii;

(2) The dean of the school of nursing and dental
hygiene at the University of Hawaii;

(3) The vice dean for academic affairs at the school
of medicine who represents graduate medical education at the University of
Hawaii;

(4) The director of health or the director's
designated representative;

(5) The director of the Cancer Research Center of
Hawaii; and

(6) Eight persons to be appointed by the governor as
follows:

(A) Three persons each of whom shall
represent a different hospital at which accredited graduate medical education
programs are conducted;

(B) Three persons each [of] whom represent
the health professions community;

(C) One person who represents the federal
healthcare sector; and

(D) One person from the general public.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (a)(1),
(2), (3), and (4), no two council members may be employed by or affiliated with
the same:

(1) Institution of higher education;

(2) State agency outside of higher education; or

(3) Private entity.

(c) Terms of office of council members shall
be as follows:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the dean of
the school of medicine, dean of the school of nursing and dental hygiene, vice
dean for academic affairs of the school of medicine at the University of
Hawaii, and the director of health, or the director's designated
representative, shall be permanent ex officio members of the council, and the
remaining nonpermanent council members shall be appointed to four-year terms of
office;

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the governor at
the time of the initial appointment shall reduce the terms of four nonpermanent
council members to two years to ensure that approximately half of the
nonpermanent council members are appointed every two years; and

(3) If a vacancy occurs in the membership for any
reason, the replacement shall be appointed by the governor for the unexpired
term in the same manner as the original appointment was made.

(d) The dean of the school of medicine at the
University of Hawaii shall chair the council. The council shall annually elect
a vice chair from among the members of the council.

(e) All council members shall have voting
rights. A majority of the council members shall constitute a quorum. The
action of a majority of a quorum shall be the action of the council.

(f) Per diem and expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties may be paid to a council member who:

(1) Is not a government employee; or

(2) Is a government employee, but does not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from the council member's employing unit for
service to the council.

A council member may decline to receive per diem and
expenses for service to the council. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next